Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-26] Jurisdiction. (a) A court
of this State having jurisdiction over the controversy and the parties may
enforce an agreement to arbitrate.

(b) An agreement to arbitrate providing for
arbitration in this State confers exclusive jurisdiction on the court to enter
judgment on an award under this chapter. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Case Notes

To the extent that there may be a conflict between the
jurisdictional provisions of this chapter and chapter 89, chapter 89 takes
precedence over this chapter. 132 H. 492 (App.), 323 P.3d 136 (2014).

Cited: 132 H. 426, 322 P.3d 966 (2014).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next